5 I haven't had the pleasure of visiting the Gilbert location, so I came in with high expectations based solely on my stellar experiences at the other Uptown restaurants. Today was the hard open, and I must say, I'm pretty impressed. I love how the staff rotates between Windsor, Parlor, Postino's, and now here. Upon arrival, we were greeted with fresh tortilla chips and deliciously spicy fire roasted salsa, and served our beers shortly thereafter. We opted for the ceviche appetizer to start, and damn! I'm a ceviche addict, and theirs rivals Hula's in awesomeness. Fresh shrimp, tomato, avocado, cucumber, onion, the obligatory lime juice, and... jicama. Jicama! Quite a satisfying crunch. For our entree, my accomplice and I split the El Capitan torta- a fresh toasted bun with carne asada, salsa, avocado, and shredded lettuce. The torta COULD be piled a little higher, based on the size of the bun, but the flavors were stellar, fresh, and just plain freaking delicious! We closed the meal out with fresh churros with chocolate dipping sauce, but I was much too full too eat more than half of one! Rest assured, Joyride is now on our roster of neighborhood restaurants to bicycle to. I'm in love!
5 What, what  a great find! I usually am on top of the new restaurants that are opening in the area, but somehow this one got by me. Wifey spotted it the other day and we decided to check it out yesterday. It just opened on Tuesday, so it was perfect timing. The location is great, it's located right next to Postino on Central. The decor is done awesome, very urban but warm if that makes sense. The restaurant was very busy but seemed to run like a well oiled machine. We were seated pretty quick, they have a nice patio and tons of indoor/bar dining options. We started with a few cocktails, traditional margarita and I went with the blood orange margarita. Wifey wasn't over the moon about her traditional margarita, was a bit flat but my  blood orange margarita was great. they have a well rounded menu with tacos, tamales, tortas, burritos and a few specials. They also have a short list of apps/shareable plates. we started with the guacamole, which was done perfect. I opted for 3 tacos: Fried fish, braised beef and this spicy chicken. They were all great, my fave being the  braised beef. I also got the Mexican street corn, which was delicious. Wifey got the Chilaquiles, and LOVED her dish. They even have a kids menu for my daughter, which is always welcome. All in all, great good, superior service and perfect location. I'll for sure be back!
5 Simply amazing! The restaurant is casual and modern decorated. It's right on Central Avenue and busy at lunch time. We got there just in time before it got really busy. The service was fantastic. I ordered the Bandit which was a fajita combination plate of shredded meat and avocado and beans and rice (which they had to substitute for roasted veggies). I am trying to go gluten free and the waitress said that all of their entrees except for their flour tortillas they use for burritos are made of corn so another huge plus. Meal was delicious and I will indeed be back.
4 Went here with my girlfriend last night and had a good experience. Hostess was friendly and we were seated promptly. The number one thing that stood out to me was the ambiance in the place. Really cool looking decorative design in this restaurant. The vaulted ceilings above the bar really pop.  Our drink orders were taken in only a few minutes and our food orders were taken shortly after. We ordered a combination of different tacos. The fish, veggies, and shrimp tacos are delicious. Overall, this place does a good job!   Pros:   -Great food -Good service -Reasonable prices  -Awesome ambiance  Cons -I believe I left my card there and still waiting to hear back
4 Braised beef taco and fried fish taco!!   The restaurant opened recently and I think it's gonna be one of the new trendy places to go to this year. It was very busy when 4 of us went and waited about a half hour on a Friday night. It was our first time there and the ceviche really stood out so we tried to order that but the server said they sold the last one, but recommended the tuna stack. It was good, and makes me curious what the ceviche would be like.   So, they have this deal in the menu, when you order three tacos, you get a side for free. I chose the braised beef, the fried fish taco, and the chicken taco with a lime aioli sauce and the rice on the side. I didn't like the chicken at all, but the braised beef was juicy and succulent and yum!! My friend also states the grilled fish taco was great too! But he didn't like the carne asada, it was too sweet, he said. He also ordered pinto beans as his side but the server said the last one sold out too, so he settled for black beans   The servers were all really busy but still very Attentitive. I took off a star because of the food that wasn't available and because when a different server brought out our food, they only brought 8 tacos and I said we ordered nine and we had to straighten it out with the original server first before they brought out the last taco. Just a tiny hiccup in an otherwise seamless night.   They also have unique drink choices. They have these juices from freshly squeezed fruits which can be served with alcohol. I tried the cucumber mint with gin and it was very refreshing!
5 We are slightly obsessed with Upward Projects so last year we took a road trip out to Gilbert to check out their newest concept: Joyride Tacos. You can imagine how excited we were when we heard they were opening a location here in Central Phoenix, just a couple of miles from our home. By opening weekend the staff seems to already have the routine down. We were quickly greeted when we walked in the door, and received excellent service throughout the night.   Drinks were good, but our favorites of the evening were the chips and salsa (one of the key elements for any Mexican restaurant), and the chicken enchiladas! I don't think I could say enough good things about the enchiladas. Excellent!!  We had another stop planned for the evening so we skipped dessert, but we will definitely be trying it on a future trip.   Our one complaint would have to be our table. We were unfortunate enough to be sat at one of three small tables for two. The tables are in a row and all right next to each other. We felt cramped and a little like we were joining our neighbors dinner party. All the other tables in the restaurant looked great though, next time we will make sure we aren't sat there.
5 Upward project has done it again. We went to Joyride Sunday,early afternoon and had a great experience. Greeted by a friendly young lady, taken to a table,brought us a high chair for our 15month old daughter.  Right away our server, Lori, came over quickly with chips and absolutely delicious salsa. I had been to another new taco restaurant the night before, but the salsa at joyride is far, far more flavorful.  We order right away, nachos, recommended by Lori. My husband loved them!  I order carne asada torta it was absolutely perfect. My husband got chicken tacos. Very good.  Lori also told us that Joyride has a kids plate. Perfect!  A another helpful young lady brought over a adorable kid friendly plate with two chicken tacos, fruit and I order a side of bomb black beans, which my daughter loved!  Great service, everyone who works there was very  friendly and seemed eager to please there customers.  I can't wait for our next  visit back to Joyride.
5 The staff was very friendly & attentive.  My tacos were great and we really enjoyed the atmosphere!  We will be coming back soon!  It is very rare to get such great service only a week after a new establishment opens.
5 Great food, service, and atmosphere! My new favorite Mexican place in town. Carne asada taco and crispy fish tacos are amazing. Upward projects, you once have done it again. Thank you
3 Let me start by saying, I would have rated Joyride a 4, but for one significant fact--the mixed drinks are a poor value. Nine dollars for a small glass that is filled with 75% ice just doesn't cut it. To top it off, they arrive with short straws (Disney made the 2nd and 3rd stories of Main Street buildings progressively smaller so you would think they were taller) which causes your drink to disappear even faster. When we ordered a third house Margarita and requested less ice, the bartender limited the ice but simply poured the drink shorter. I guess they have to pay for the exquisite decorations and furnishings somehow!   Joyride is cut in the new mold of restaurants intended for both seeing and being seen. Where the value of the meal you pay for is significantly in the theater of the atmosphere. Something you can't take home with you. That said, there's a lot of theater here, and it is very well done. Everything exudes quality. From the chairs, comfy and styled, to the decorations. Not a stone appears to have been unturned to create and resurrect images, colors and shapes evocative of childhood memories residing in the deepest recesses of baby boomer brains. It is outstanding. And the food is a decent value as well.   I had the carne asada burrito and my wife had the chicken tamale. Both very good and ample. the chips are great and the service attentive. In fact, I would say that the staff was a cut above the (low) average set by Fox Concept restaurants. Everyone from the greeter/hostess to the waitstaff and manager were solicitous and genuine (well as genuine as they have time to be). These are real people with a mission and vision instilled by the owners...not bimbos and bimbettes schooled in the fine art of maximizing (restaurant) revenue, minimizing expense and maximizing tip income.   So, Joyride delivers more than most theater restaurants: good value in food (both cost and quality), great surroundings (visually and in terms of comfort) but you pay for it in the cocktails. I suppose an alternate strategy would be to rely on beer. Or, if you don't drink beer, have one cocktail at home before coming over (but who wants to make a margarita at home, especially on a Friday night after work)...I have never found homemade ones to be that great. Joyride does offer a taller glass for an additional two dollars. Which I suppose has the amount of alcohol that the $9 one should have.  Also, as an earlier review warned, avoid the double trio of two person tables sandwiched together at either end of the lovely round booths. You will feel uncomfortable and untethered as the wait-staff traverses these thoroughfares (a feng-shui moment).  Even though you do end up paying more...you don't feel quite as cheated as at the other "theme" restaurants.
5 este lugar es muy delicioso. happy hour era genial! Sugiero la margarita de naranja de sangre o un mojito de piña! la comida es increíble. la salsa es adictivo!
4 I am so excited that this place joined the neighborhood. When we stepped foot in, I was immediately wowed by the décor....it is just gorgeous and visually pleasing. The staff were very friendly, even when we were standing around one of the many entrances not sure where the hostess stand was. No joke, there are like 4 ways you can enter from the outside.   I ordered a house margarita (not a fan) and the chilaquiles. The dish was very good....definitely a fan! The chips, guac, and salsa were good. Since I did not like my margarita, I switched with my husband who had the blood orange rita. Way better.   The food took a really long time to come but it was a nice surprise when the manager or owner came to the table to apologize without any mention from us. I really enjoyed the atmosphere of this place and everything that came with it!
3 It was Ok.. I thought they were Unorganized .. and its hard when every server asks you if everything is OK,, I am a fan of hard shell Tacos ,, I did like the Standard taco
3 On first arriving, I was really confused by the parking situation.. I was informed by the valet guys that I was not supposed to enter off of Central?!? and that I could not park myself even though the lot was empty...?  My party was seated right away. The place is so dimly lit that the two older folks I had with me complained they couldn't see. Haha, old people. I could see fine, but it was a hair too dark and one measly table candle didn't help much. The salsa that came out with the chips was smoky chipotle and not good to me, instead of offering to bring me a replacement when I asked about other options, the waitress suggested that I buy other types of salsa :( rude. I did and I wasn't impressed with those either.  I had The Standard tacos, they were very good. One person in my group got the carne asada tacos and mouth fulls of fat, I guess the chef didn't trim it close enough. They excluded his meal from the bill :) The hipster staff was indistinguishable from the patrons, they also weren't the friendliest servers I've had either.  The atmosphere was fun though, and a nice contrast to the neighboring restaurants. I think this place would make a better bar than restaurant. I am a local, and if I'm looking for great tacos, I'm not going here, there are lots of other places in town with way better mexican food. I would come here again for drinks and atmosphere, and maybe a taco to offset the alcohol ;)
5 Great concept, fantastic food and warm, open, laid back feel.  If I lived close, this could very well become my regular watering hole...  Their spin on Mexican fare is pretty damned good.  Everything my friends and I had was awesome. I highly recommend the crispy fish tacos and the blood orange margarita!  The parking is a tad weird, but it should not be enough to deter you.
4 I've been to Joyride a few times now and Upward has done it again. They have built a little Monopoly in my hood and I couldn't be happier. Both times I have been here I rode my bike, they have ample bike parking and a big patio.  The bar is gorgeous with the stained glass vases and the concept of the restaurant is very laid back and open. I have a feeling I will be spending a lot of time here when I can pull myself away from the Windsor.   I also love that they honor the Upward tradition of $5 till $5 on pitchers and wine.   The tacos are street style and with so many street style tacos shop these days it is hard to find something phenomenal on the menu. That being said though everything I tried was very good. The carne, the nachos and the salsa will all keep me coming back for more.   I'd love to see them do brunch!
5 Came here for dinner on a Saturday night. we got lucky and found a parking spot along the street but they have purchased the lot just south of the building with extra parking spots. our wait to sit was only a few minutes although I would anticipate a longer wait during the busy hours. Staff was very friendly and on top of getting us drinks while we waited for our table. Loved the atmosphere here, and I don't know what it is about the Upward Projects but they always play great music. You get complimentary chips and salsa to snack on while your picking out your food. The salsa was very good. We ordered 3 tacos which were all fantastic and they came with a side, we chose the grilled vegetables. Oh my, simply delicious. I will be bring friends here next time.
5 What a JoY! We went at 8:15 on a Friday night so of course it was packed.  We were quoted a 45 minute wait which is normal in Phoenix. The bar is huge with plenty of seats and easy to get a drink.  However, even better is the patio on the north side of the building, that is separate from the dining patio, and perfect for waiting.  There is plenty of seating, a few table, and a server dedicated to making sure you never are thirsty!  We found 3 seats right away, and they brought us a basket of fresh chips and salsa and waters to start while we looked over all the drinks.  Within minutes we all had margaritas in our hands and we were happy.  Very smart move Joyride.  The 45 minutes flew by because we could converse and drink and munch on chips the whole time.   We were greeted with the same friendliness when we were seated at our table in the dining room.  Again, waters and fresh chips and salsa right away.  Our drinks from earlier were effortlessly transferred to our dining bill, so there was no urgent need to close out with one server before being sat at our table.   We changed up our drinks inside and were impressed by each one we had.  All of the nectars and juices are house made which makes the drinks very fresh.  No bottled mixers or syrupy concoctions.  The house margarita was perfect.  Not sweet or overly tart.  Just refreshing.  The Blood Orange Margarita was a little sweeter but also delicious.  The Key Largo was something else.  Very pina colada-esque but better.  Whatever they used to rim the glass made the drink.  Everyone was impressed.   The food was very well done.  We stared with street corn, which was flavored well, but will probably be even better when corn is actually in season.  It just didn't have the sweet and juiciness that you get from corn on the cob in late summer.  Our friend had the tortilla soup with chicken which she said was fantastic and perfectly spiced. We all had tacos of course, although I was very tempted by the chilequilles.  Next time, maybe for lunch!  My favorite were the shrimp tacos.  Huge shrimp, great flavor, and NOT breaded!  The baja fish tacos were fantastic as well.  Finally a place that does grilled fish tacos well in Phoenix.  The braised beef taco was tender and juicy as well.  The tortillas are homemade and amazing and much larger than your typical street taco. Here is the one complaint I had about the food.  The side dishes were not up to par.  We had the pinto beans and the rice.  Both were pretty forgettable.  I am very surprised by this because Windsor, also an Upward Project restaurant, is known for their sides.  (hello Joe's church potatoes and mac n' cheese).  So next time we will try some other sides in hope of finding something better.  The sides are included when ordering 3 tacos, otherwise you really don't need them after all the chips and tacos! We usually skip desert because we are rarely impressed by restaurant deserts, and I for one would rather have another basket of chips and salsa.  I am a salt guy, not a sweets guy.  BUT, Better Than Betty's was one of the best desserts I have had at a restaurant in a really long time.  It was perfect to share by the way, even by 3 people.  The brownie was incredible...chewy inside and slightly crusty outside and just the slightest hint of spice that made it less Betty Crocker and more Nacho Libre!  Then there was a layer of caramel that was divine.  It had to be homemade.  And a huge scoop of dulce de leche ice cream that was definitely homemade.  As soon as we tasted it we knew they must have made it across the street at Churn.  If you have been there you know what I am talking about.  That smooth creamy homemade ice cream that is so dangerous because it is walking distance from my house.  Perfect.  Oh, and the candied pecans were a bonus.  They almost had a caramel corn flavor to them.  Anyways, the combination of flavors left us all speechless.   So if I had to make a recommendation for diners, it would be cocktails, 2 tacos each (which is very hard to narrow down from your choices) skip the sides, and dessert is a must! The place looks great and I can't wait for spring when they open up all the sliding windows and doors.   We have tried Taco Guild as well (see my review) and Joyride is 10x better and way more fun. I forgot to mention the service.  Everyone was so friendly and fun.  The servers inside at our table, and outside on the patio, were very helpful with recommendations and explanations.  We were never without drinks or chips and salsa or water.  Super attentive and just a great, laid back, easy vibe that is normal from these 4 neighborhood restaurants on this corner.  That is why we love them and keep coming back!  (it helps they are all walking distance too!)
4 Went to Joyride for the first time on Sunday, around brunch time.  Sat at the bar, ordered a cold Negro Modelo - they only offer it on draft.  Staff was very friendly and engaging. The place is super cute, love the outside patio, good blend of background music.  For the food, I started with guacamole, chips and salsa - all were tasty.  The salsa had a nice kick.  Tried the shrimp, fish and ahi tacos.  The shrimp was flavorful, fish appeared slightly under cooked - so that lost points.  The ahi was by far the winner - amazing actually.  Will definitely go back, thrilled to see more restaurants in Central Phx.
1 parking is a mess...food...so so..they seem to think their salsa is the bomb..but the flavors just don't quite hit the spot. The concept is great and the atmosphere is good.. even the bar seating (which is extensive) is comfortable) Service could be much  improved...come on it took forever to get a bottle of beer....the burrito...carne asada.. not much flavor..meat was tough and the various other ingredients just didnt play well with each other...very dry...when I want a burrito grilled on one side..I will say so.. ..overall I think they are trying to hard....
3 Place was slammed. Service was good but the tacos came out cold and the carne asada was burned. Decent place for drinks in trendy atmosphere.
4 Already my fourth, or is it fifth, visit here... And for good reason! The tacos are great :) Even after this many visits, I still haven't had a chance to try them all... Or all of the margaritas... I keep re-ordering favorites from the last time ;)   Some of those include the carnitas, braised beef, crispy fish, and Baha fish tacos... Do yourself a favor and order three just to get the free side of black beans or roasted vegetables tossed in the guajillo pepita salsa. One trick I plan to try next trip is to order them one or two at a time to ensure they are hot when I'm ready to much 'em down as I discovered after the first two, I needed a slight breather. That gave the Baja taco too much time to cool off. It was still delicious but would have been even better right off the grill.  All the toppings are fresh and crisp and will vary by the taco, but come in deliciously hand made corn tortillas instead of the mass produced machined ones you'll find elsewhere.   Add some guacamole or ceviche as a starter and you'll have PLENTY to feed you AND a friend...   Just like other Upward Projects restaurants, they do Happy Hour all day until 5pm with $5 pitchers, coctails, and wine... Quite the deal :) And just like the other locations, they've done a great job with their employees. They are all VERY well versed in their products, preparations, and customer service skills... You will feel very well taken care of.  My advice... Wear your stretchy pants ;)
5 If you love Postinos, Federal and Windsor you with LOVE LOVE this place.  On our way to Postino's for lunch on Saturday we saw this huge crowd at a new place across the street and decided to try it.  Everything was delicious, especially the blood orange margarita and the service was great.  Definitely will be back!
4 Went to Joyride today and really had a wonderful time.  Their salsa is fantastic and I wasn't even to the bottom of the chips when they brought me a refill of chips and salsa. The food is fresh and just the right portions and lots of vegetarian options available.  I recommend the Mexican corn from the starter menu and the pineapple Fresca!  Joyride's Happy Hour specials are the best just like all the Upward restaurants.  I hung out there with a few friends for an hour or two without pressure to leave or order more. I will definitely frequent Joyride.
4 Upward has sure did it again. Great concept,  love the high top chairs. Love the whole vibe to this place. :)   Chip and salsa??!!? Yuppppp. Keeep them coming this wayyy. Hehe Great selection of hot tea :) I enjoyed my garden burrito. OMG! The mushroom though.  Idk what they marinate it with. It was so soft yet chewy and so tasteful.  The customer service was okay. I had to ask three different ppl for water and napkins. :/ bur other that,  I'll be coming back.
1 Wow...really disappointed!  After reading such stellar reviews thought I was in for a real treat...nothing could be further from the truth: truly awful tacos... salsas gringoesque...over-priced drinks...horrendous sides (salty pintos too small cucumber salad).  Eager staff, but not well-trained.  This is the kind of place Seftel will rave about...sorry, this is strictly "turista"!
3 Good - not great, although my 13 year old loved his burrito. The food was O.K., nothing I would crave or go back for. Everyone we came in contact with was very nice and attentive but I personally prefer having one server. We had 3 people asking the same questions 3 times over.
5 I loved this place! Went for a late Saturday lunch and the house was rocking. Hostess said 20 minute wait, but with a nice large bar we were able to find two open seats right away and avoid the masses who were lingering. I really dug the decor, and there looked to be lots of outdoor patio space to enjoy too. The house salsa was super flavorful and the chips were the wonderfully thin and crunchy type that I can't get enough of with my Mexican food. I ordered the Baja fish, Chicken Tinga and Cochinita Pibil tacos with the cucumber orange salad side. All of the tacos were great, but that simple, perfect salad was shear perfection. I want some now just thinking about it! Couple of good draft beer choices and what appeared to be a pretty extensive bar. I plan a return sometime soon for a specialty coctele or two!  Joyride, ya done good.
4 This place is really beautiful. I love the decor and ambiance. It feels nice and easy. The carne asada is sweet and delicious, the salsa and chips fantastic, the fish tacos rocked but the street corn was odd and mediocre at best. And I love street corn. I'll definitely be back.
4 Really great service here. Everyone is very attentive and super nice. We tried the 2 tacos and side salad happy hour deal. We tried the carne Asada, shrimp and one of the pork options. The shrimp was definitely the favorite. The chips and salsa aren't our favorite, but I think we will definitely give it another chance and try something else.
4 Really tasty new taco joint in town! Servers are really friendly and they have great beer on tap. Love the atmosphere here. Their chips and salsa are A+ and they just kept slingin em our way. For every 3 tacos you get, you can get a side for free (hells ya) so if you're with a group, I say order a shit ton of tacos and try all the sides you can.   I had the Cochinita Pibil and Shrimp tacos, I've had better Pibil but the shrimp was incredible. I've heard great things about the ahi taco and veggie ones too. I also got to try the beans, slaw, and orange/cucumber salad. All very good.   Also, valet parking which is nice.
3 The  place looks very hip, surprisingly they were not that busy at 12.pm the waiter was friendly and kept the chips  coming , we ordered the harbernero sauce which was hot .the wait was long but the food was good
5 Great food, friendly staff, and another cool restaurant from upward projects.  Family style tacos but also perfect individual lunch portions.
5 Great experience at this restaurant! I brought clients here for a work dinner on a busy Wednesday night. We were a party of 7 and had a short 10 minute wait, eventually getting a table on the patio facing Central Ave right in front of the fireplace! They cranked up the heaters, not knowing half the party was in town from Chicago and quickly turned them down at our request. The blood orange margarita was excellent, not too sweet but smooth. We had the cheese y màs (a chunky queso dip) which was awesome, along with ceviche (very good, light and not too acidic) and the guacamole (alright, but not in my top 5). The chicken enchiladas were very good with red and green sauce, spicier than I expected. The staff was attentive but not overbearing kept waters full and cocktails coming. I'd definitely pay this place another visit.
2 Place is beautiful inside and out. Food is mediocre at best. I might have returned for the atmosphere if it not for the supposed owners and management. I was having lunch on the patio and had SEVERAL screaming kids climbing a tree RIGHT next to my table throwing rocks and screaming. When I notified management I was informed those were the owners kids and he couldn't do anything about it. He bought my meal instead. I said thanks but that's not what I want. I want to relax and enjoy my mediocre food in peace. I am completely turned off that the supposed owners would let their children disturb their customers dining experience. And even more turned off that the problem wasn't fixed. I will not be returning.
2 Went their last night.  Food was okay but what was most annoying was the 4-5 different servers that kept coming to our table switching out salt and pepper shakers by reaching over the table without even asking, taking away drinks that were not finished and just always showing up at the table interrupting our conversation.  We had to ask for chips and a couple of other items as least two times before we received them.  No my first choice for a place to visit again.
4 My co-worker and I decided to grab a table on the bright and cheery front patio, filled with sunshine yellow chairs.  We immediately appreciated the fact that they saved the two substantial trees that helped to block the noise from Central Avenue.  Now down to business.  We were greeted by our server, who quickly brought our beverages, crunchy chips and salsa for starters.    For lunch I ordered the "Lunch Special" which was a choice of 2 tacos (served on made-to-order corn tortillas) and choice of soup or small salad for around $10.  I chose the Shrimp Taco (with grilled shrimp, Mexican slaw and pico gringo), the Carnitas Taco (shredded pork, tomatillo salsa, cilantro & onion) and the Rhythmic Beet Salad (mixed greens, beets, papaya, avocado, goat cheese, toasted pepitas, cilantro & scallions in a honey champagne vinaigrette(recommended by our server).     Everything was DELICIOUS!  And although I had plenty of food, I found myself wishing that I could order more just to try the great-looking combinations.  Every taco has slightly different ingredients. Not just a change in the protein, like most traditional Mexican restaurants. They also don't come with the heavy grease and mountains of grated cheddar cheese that you'll find on the majority of valley tacos. Each item was light, fresh and yummy!    The service was prompt, friendly and courteous too!  I can't wait to go back and try something else on the menu.  I'll be sure to take my camera for pictures too.
4 Tried Joyride for the first time on Tuesday. I loved it. Their salsa was amazing and they have a really good selection of draught beer. I had the Sierra Nevada Ruthless Rye.   What made me especially happy were the really nice options for vegetarians. This can sometimes be difficult at Mexican restaurants. I asked our server (we sat at the bar) about suggestions, and she said that anything with their signature veggie mix was good. I chose the enchiladas, which also had goat cheese, and they were AWESOME.   The veggie mix was delicious and not boring, the creaminess of the goat cheese, and just the right amount of heat (I selected red sauce) made a killer and satisfying combination. At $9.00 the portions were more than generous, but my companion and I worked together to finish them up.   This will definitely be my new go-to spot for Mexican in this neighborhood. Again, they only lose one star for the parking situation. I'm never keen on forced valet, because I rarely have cash to tip.
3 Living in the Phoenix area, there are no shortage of Mexican food options.  To stand out, you really have to be doing something interesting.  From an aesthetics standpoint, Upward Projects is definitely bringing the goods by creating a Mexican cantina/taco stand with a hip urban vibe.  As for the food?  Well, that could use some work.  Came here on a lunch date on Saturday.  The place was busy, but not totally full.  We elected to sit out on the patio on a beautiful day.  The service we received was prompt and friendly throughout.  Seeing how this is Joyride Taco House we figured we'd find out if the tacos would indeed stand out.  Each of us got the same three tacos:  The Standard (a chicken and avocado mix), Carne Asada, and Shrimp.  The shrimp was good, the carne asada was adequate (though I've had better), and the standard was kind of disappointing.  The biggest letdown for me were the tortillas.  They were very dry and stale tasting.  Did not taste fresh made at all.  My side of Joy Rice with Salsa was also pretty average.  In terms of ambience and service I was not disappointed.  The building looks great with a cool bar area and a great laid back outdoor patio.  Upward Projects has done a great rehab of this old building.  But I've had much better tacos at nearby neighborhood spots like Tacos Atoyac and Gallo Blanco.  If Joyride's tacos can eventually reach that standard or better, then they'll work out just fine.  For now, the quality has room for improvement.
3 Hmm, I am kind of torn on this one. Big thumbs up to Upward Projects for the renovation on the building. The vibe and the decor are top notch. I only wish the food matched the building. The drinks are very good - Blood Orange Margarita was very good. Also, a few good Mexican beers on the menu. As for the food, I was not really impressed. The nachos were okay, but not great. The ceviche was overwhelmed by the lime. I had "The Beast" burrito enchilada style. It had an underlying sweet taste that was simply unappealing.  I am sure that there are great things on the menu; however, the items on that picked would not be on that list.   N*joy
2 Went to Joyride hoping for a casual taco and a good marg. The restaurant was packed and super noisey. The food was very mediocre. I ordered the beast burritto which sounded tasty on the menu- carne asada, beans, avacado, and two types of salsa.  What they delivered to my table was not so appealing. It was a burrito consisting of 99.9% dry, unflavorful meat, hardly any salsa, beans, or avacado. I ordered a margarita which was very ordinary. The biggest reason I am rating the restaurant so low is because of the rediculously loud music blaring in the restaurant. The place was packed and noisey to begin with and then add the crazy loud music and it made the place almost unbearable. The decor and renovation were done very well. Unfortunately the medicore food and horrible atmosphere will keep me from coming back.
4 I'm so thankful Upward Projects - the restaurant-building brand that brought the Valley favorites such as Postino, Windsor and Federal Pizza - finally opened a Mexican food joint with their Gilbert spot Joyride Taco House. The Central Phoenix version debuted last month, and I went there this weekend to sit on the colorful expansive patio in this gorgeous Valley weather.  The décor and menu at Phoenix's Joyride is the same as the Gilbert location. I love Joyride's chips and salsa. The salsa is the perfect level of spiciness, while the chips are thin. They're the perfect way to start your meal.  At both locations, I ordered the Veggie and Goat Cheese Enchiladas ($9) - they were just so darn good the first time! They come smothered in both red ancho chile and salsa verde sauce and are bursting with that delicious goat cheese.  It's a really massive entrée, but I still ordered a side of rice ($3) and black beans ($3) - am I the only one who thinks rice and beans need to complement every Mexican meal?  That is actually probably the one thing I would change here: make the entrée portions smaller (for example, one enchilada was plenty for me), and add rice and beans to meals. As it is now, I received two complete meals with what I ordered - at only $15, that's not bad, either.
3 "meh"  gave it three stars for the great ambiance and nice service, but food was a little lack luster.
5 Great atmosphere. Great price, great salsa and tasty tacos. We plan to go back soon.
4 Great place for a quick lunch or afternoon cocktail and apps.  Food is outstanding, drinks were also quite nice.  HH til 5pm every day, means $5 cocktails, pitchers of beer and glasses of wine.  Local/seasonal beers featured on draft.  Interesting 'aquas frescas' cocktails can be ordered virgin, as well.  Love the building/setup.  Great patio to while away the weekend afternoon.  Glad it moved in, I'll be here frequently.
3 I did not want to write a review based on my first experience but now that I've gone twice I have to put in my ten cents... First off, I love the decor and love their bar. I'm a big fan of Upward Project but this place isn't my cup of tea...the first time I went it was opening week. One of the owners spilt a glass of water on me but they compensated by giving our table a complimentary appetizer. We had the ceviche and am glad it was complimentary because it did not taste that great. I ordered one of the burritos  and asked for enchilada style...the sauce was sweet. How can chile sauce be sweet?!? The rice was not cooked and the beans were bland....since it was opening week I decided not to judge the place by my first meal..  We decided to give it another try. The food again was lackluster. And the service was great at the beginning but after they dropped off our food we never saw our server again. Thank goodness they have other options that I enjoy. Just wished Joyride would was more authentic with the flavors...
4 Went to Joyride on a Friday night. Cool vibe, nice patio area with a server to get you cocktails and chips while you wait for your table.   Pros:  awesome decor, patio. Yummy chips and salsa. Reasonable prices. Braised beef taco was solid.   Cons:  Taco's came out cold, nothing hot about anyone's entree's.  A touch too loud  Nachos were ok, was expecting more flavor.   I'd be willing to go back on a week night and try this place again!
5 Amazing margaritas....yes $9, but worth it.  Tacos are perfect and the guacamole is yum.  What stands out is the service.....best in Phoenix.
1 You let me down, Yelp!  For the first time ever, Yelp has been way off on this one. Like some of the other reviewers, I too am obsessed with Upward Projects restaurants. Which was why I was even more excited to see this new place getting great Yelp reviews. And as we walked in, the ambiance got my hopes even higher. Here's why we are never going back:  -Over 30 minute wait, and they don't serve anything but chips and salsa in the cocktail area. It was even more frustrating to see empty tables inside during the entire duration of our wait. Poor service on the patio.  -When we were seated, no one greeted us for 5-10 minutes. Very odd, a server finally came up and asked if we were "still doing alright?" Umm since we've been here for over 45 minutes, were ready to order.   -Food came up quick but was mediocre at best. A beer I ordered when the food arrived wasn't brought until everyone was done eating. Attitude from the waitress when I sent it back.   -At some point during our meal, a waiter approached us confirming he had given the card back from our tab on the patio. We told him he hadn't so he said he would look for it.  -While waiting for our bill, at least 4 people asked us if we wanted more chips and salsa. No, but wed like the bill! It finally came but the waitress didn't even make eye contact so we couldn't tell her they still had our card!!! Another 5-10 minutes we finally flag down another server and ask her to find our card. She brings it and takes it with the bill. Several minutes later we see her arranging a table for a large party and wonder where she put our bill. Then our waitress comes and asks where the bill is, and as were pointing out the other server a 3rd server drops it off. This place is certainly some kind of ride! What a mess. Won't be going back.
1 Disappointed. The decor is beautiful but the food is bland. Disconnected service. Parking is a nightmare! The manager is very sweet and tried to correct everything from mistakes on our order to mistakes on our bill but the food isn't good enough to return.
1 Joyride was more like a 10 car pile up. No flavor. Meh!
5 Great food in a hip & fun place! Try a sampler of fish tacos and their creative specialty drinks for a great change to your boring dinners out.
4 I've been here about 5 times and I'm finally going to yelp it! This place is one of my favorite spots to relax. On a Friday, I want to go out to a trendy spot with fresh food! This is the place. In this part of town you can't be sub-par. And Joyride meets the mark! The atmosphere is warm and easy. The staff all have smiles on their faces and everyone seems to be having a great time working. Food is great; despite previous reviews, I never had a bland bite. My shrimp taco had two pieces of over cooked shrimp and the third piece was perfect. Consistency would have been reviewed with 5 stars... I'm still in love with Joyride! In fact, I can't wait to get back!
5 The absolute best food ever!!!   The drinks are the bomb!  Pineapple Mojito is my favorite!!!!  LOVE this place!!!  The patio is a great place for happy hour!
1 I returned to the Joy Ride tonight after trying it out last week for the first time & I received amazing service tonight. The staff tonight was excellent, knowledgable, & my tortilla-less & cheese-less burrito was on the house. Thank you.  Lets rewind back to last Saturday though, when I tried Joy Ride for the first time. Before I agreed to meet up w/ my family there I called to see if Joy Ride had vegan options, I was informed that they did & I made my way to the restaurant. We had a lovely waitress that late afternoon & prior to ordering I wanted her to be aware that I was a vegan, meaning I do not consume meat, dairy, or any animal byproducts. She went over the menu w/ me & recommended the veggie tacos, she said they would be an excellent choice for me as the white/magic sauce was vegan. I was so happy to hear that I had options. I had asked her what kind of tortilla comes w/ the tacos & she said corn but They also have a flour tortilla options which also fit my dietary needs, per waitress. Perfect. I ordered one taco as the veggies are pre-stir fried & they were unable to accommodate to my request asking for them raw, which was okay. I was satisfied w/ my one taco, I even picked some of the cucumber salad from my brother, which was a nice touch to my meal as well. I was pretty happy.  Tonight I learned that my lovely waitress was rather uneducated & spoke out of her a_s. I went back tonight on a casual date w/ my boyfriend who had just finished a 12 hour day at work. I wanted it to be all about him tonight & I thought Joy Ride would be perfect for both of us since he has never been there before. I went in & decided to go w/ the same order I had last time, since I was already reassured last Saturday of what my vegan options are. For some reason, something told me to make my waiter aware of my dietary restrictions prior to ordering. As I told my waiters that I was vegan, we had two, one of them recommended the tacos for me but w/o the white/magic sauce, my eyes lit up, "Why not, is the sauce not vegan friendly?" He informed me that the sauce has egg whites & it is NOT vegan. I decided not to say anything b/c it was my b/f's night. Our other waiter came back to see if we were ready to order, I informed him I would take the tacos w/o the sauce & I will take it in a flour tortilla. He then informed me that the tortilla contains lard. Oh my. Then I spoke up. I informed him that when I was here last week, I was misguided & misinformed & that I had consumed both the tortilla AND the sauce. He was so apologetic & I can tell he was concerned. BUT, like I said, it was my b/f's night, I'm done being mad for the damage that has already happened. I ordered my food as I stated earlier & my b/f left happy, that's all I wanted.  As to the Joy Ride, I will not return. I do NOT understand how LIGHTLY a persons dietary restrictions are taken. I am a vegan by choice but I also do have an allergy to egg, I even have a doctors note which is why I cannot receive a flu shot for work. I don't remember how I was feeling after I left the restaurant last Saturday so I doubt that little sauce had a major impact on me. Thank goodness. I do not have an allergy to dairy or meat, so consuming the tortilla was not harmful to me other than the fact it is against my beliefs.   There could have been more damage should I have consumed more, or maybe if I ordered more than one taco, or if my allergies were more severe. It's unbelievable to me how restaurants take this so lightly & how staff can just so confidently answer something that they are not aware of.  I'm VERY disappointed but this is not the first time this has happened to me. I also doubt it will be the last time. I feel like I just want to be DONE w/ some of these restaurants. Joy Ride, I am very done w/ you. I do thank the wonderful staff for the service TONIGHT & I appreciate their knowledge, as for the other girl, she doesn't deserve her job.
5 I was one of the lucky attendees at the Devour event this past weekend (which was awesome) and had this awesome taco. That's how it all started. A simple fish taco that blew me away. I visited the original Joyride Taco Shop out in Gilbert several months ago when they first opened but it fell off my radar. How silly of me.   So one taco was not enough and I found myself up the street after Devour closed up shop and I definitely was not disappointed! What an incredibly beautiful restaurant! Chowed down on the Chilaquiles - enjoyed some cucumber mint aqua frescas (with vodka - so cool that they offer it with your choice of spirit), ate way too many chips, and shuffled into a cab that the staff was more than happy to call for me. The service was stellar, the food was amazing, and the ambiance after the weekend rain was incredible. (I still can't believe that I ate an entire meal after Devour - my waistline definitely does not thank me. Ahh gluttony . . . .)
4 I'm so happy I finally made it to Joyride last week!!  The patio is awesome!!!  The restaurant has a unique vibe that draws you in and makes you smile!  The food is pretty good.  We're not talking gourmet here - its simple eating, but the flavors are good and its definitely worth checking out.  The Mexican Street Corn is AWESOME!!  This is definitely one of my new weekend spots for some daytime fun!!
5 Yummy food with a great, fun atmosphere. I practically drank the salsa--using the chips as mere scoopers, ha. Try not too fill up too much on chips because the tacos are great. I sampled so I could try more! Street corn was SO WORTH IT! Splurge baby! You'll become addicted to it. I really enjoyed the non-alcoholic drink options. It was fun and refreshing. Don't leave without that banana dessert thing. The name escapes me but the memory of it (in the cute presentation) remains! My feeling is enjoy it all! It's a great, friendly place to eat with friends!
3 Just got home and read some of the reviews for Joyride! I agreed with most of them! There were great things about the food and some not so great things. I absolutely loved the chicken burrito!!! It was so tasty and the tortilla was perfect...crispy but soft!  The white sauce with it was wonderful!! The black beans were bland and did not impress at all.  I also got the tortilla soup but it had a funny taste to it. Not sure about that.  I did enjoy my house margarita though!  The service was great, but we were asked if everything was ok by 3 different people and if we liked out food by two of the staff (a little much). The ambiance and decor was beautiful.  I guess I wasn't impressed enough to rush back there, but I could go back (maybe).
5 Great tacos, great atmosphere.  Looking forward to returning to try more dishes.  My friend had the enchiladas and they looked fantastic.  Good appetizers too.  So much better tasting than Taco Guild!
5 Stopped by with a large group of friends celebrating a birthday. We were all riding bikes, this place is made for this. We sat outside, it was beautiful day. Had a couple pitchers of the Black Market beer. It was very good. I would definitely recommend it.
5 Love this place - the decor is awesome and the tacos are fantastic. I loved the grilled Mahi taco with the habanero salsa. Their chips and salsa are delicious, and they have Negra Modelo on tap. Need I say more?
4 This is a real cool place to take a pit stop.  This is the old Aiellos Italian restaurant (a place I really liked) and I have to tell you they did a fantastic job of converting it.  Top notch, complete with co-ed bathrooms.  The happy hour is very appealing as well, and I would say this is a great place to stop in and have lunch (or what the heck, start your friday night).  Chips and salsa were very tasty, and the guacamole dip (with sliced jalapeños - brilliant)!  Good five dollar pitcher specials (sorry, I am never one of those helpful people that can quote you what the time frames are) but I think 11-5).  But worth looking into.  Couple things I will say on the negative side (yeah I know, wish ever review could be positive and amazing), the cheese-mas dip (basically cheese queso) was okay, but NWTC (not worth the calories in my opinion).    Tacos - if you love tacos and are really a connessieur, you might not love these.  The crunchy fish taco was okay, but really just like eating a fish-stick on a tortilla if you know what i mean.  Good, but not a huge fan.  The other tacos (carnitas, chicken tinga, and baja fish) were so-so, didn't seem to be served very warm and for me, just lackluster taste overall.  Alcohol - I tried the "hi-ball margarita" (supposedly their version of the cadillac as I was informed) in my opinion is (how can I say this nicely) not the greatest value.  Try one and see if you agree.  I think they need to up their game in this area.  So at the end of the day, I love the location, love what they have done with the place, great vibe, staff is friendly and very energetic, MUSIC ROCKS (possibly best in town, loud but I like it that way) and so I find myself a big fan, but looking for a go-to meal that I can call my own.  Yes, I will be back hunting for that in round 2 and open to any great suggestions.  And by the way guys, you need to sell some cool t-shirts (love bright colors, great to promote your brand), and give discounts to bike riders.  We like to ride our bikes with friends!!  Have fun, and find your sizzle!  Attorney Steve, the business and real estate lawyer. http://www.attorneysteve.net
4 This place was really great.  I loved all the tacos I tried and the atmosphere is really open and colorful.  They have huuuuuge booths that are a great place to bring friends.  I was there on a day when I had a party of 10-15 at any given time.  The server was great at accommodating our group - we were able to pay with several credit cards + cash as long as we divided up the items ourselves.  The only reason I wouldn't give this place 5 stars is because when I called to make the reservation for 10, the manager gave me grief that my party would be arriving & leaving at varied times, and pushed back because 'the restaurant is busy at 4:30'.  At 4:30 when I arrived, half the restaurant was empty and there wasn't a wait until shortly before 6:30, when we wrapped up and left.  I was disappointed at the attitude that a party of 10+ wouldn't be welcomed with open arms.    On a positive note, the drinks are fantastic and the open doors made this a perfect place for a spring get together.
4 As with the other Upwards Project restaurants this is a win.  It may not be authentic Mexican food but it is good.   The decor is a lot of fun.  The seating is very comfortable.  That was the first thing that was mentioned.  The booths were big and comfortable with plenty of room.  The music is fun and upbeat.   Now to the food.  The chips and salsa are great and they just keep coming.  We got the nachos which we could have finished with and had a great night.  My mother in law got the vegetarian burrito and said she would love to come back and get some more.  My husband and I got the 3 tacos and they were each very good, not authentic but still good.  My daughter had had the chicken tacos in the past so decided to have the burrito and ate every bite.  If she only kind of likes something she will eat some of it but when she eats the whole thing it means she really likes it.  The orange cucumber sale was a big hit.  The black beans were ok the rice was not so good.  For dessert we had the churros and the banana pudding.  My husband knowing full well that I am allergic explained how delicious the pudding is.  The churros come with a chocolate sauce that has a hint of spice to it.  I have already been there twice and plan on returning.
4 Great Mexican food in Central Phoenix.  I haven't been here when it's too busy, which always seems to be the case at other Upward Projects restaurants.  So I'm happy to have Joyride be my new go to.  I can find parking, get good drinks, good service, delicious tacos etc, and the best churros I've ever had.  (the cheese y mas is a must try but dangerous for the dairy intolerant)  They have a lot of open doors windows, so depending on the weather it can get a bit chilly and they keep it kinda dark.  But otherwise, we've been very happy with our dining experiences here.
4 great atmosphere, good food  wasn't too impressed with the salsa though.
4 Ask for Adrian! She is feisty and fun!  I did my favorite test of a Restaraunt.  The blind order!   Adrian selected my meal fearlessly. She was not allowed to ask me any questions, just put in her choice. Only a well trained server with great management and terrific chef can deliver on this challenge!  Better to show you than tell you what was delivered. See the attached picture.  Great outdoor/indoor mex venue.  Young vibe.   Food is unique and worth trying!  Service is paced and fun.  Juice beverages are on trend and fuzzy!  A perfect Arizona evening dinner.
5 AMAZING! I have been here twice and in my humble opinion, this place is pretty close to having the best tacos in Phoenix. Their flavors are really defined in each of the taco selections. The size of the piece of Ahi Tuna in my taco was impressive, I'd say at least an inch in diameter. The specialty cocktails are innovative and refreshing. The decor is fun and hip and the place just has a good vibe. This is definitely a wonderful place for date night or lunch with the office crew. I will probably visit here monthly!!
1 Plan on taking ear plugs so the concert style music does not make one deaf. Forget having any conversations unless you use sign language . The staff is helpful but it wasn't their fault the the fried fish tacos were not a big hit. The fish was strong and smelled before arriving at the table, and were over cooked. The shrimp tacos had no flavor, but I find that everywhere. The beef ones were good and the black beans . After going to Tacolicious in San Francisco nothing in Phoenix really stands up to what they should taste like.
5 This place is better than Blanco. The Beast is a must-try as well. Be sure to have it enchilada style!
4 Good service, good atmosphere, good food and reasonable prices.  The salsa is really tasty and I'm loving the veggie enchiladas. The tacos are good, not awesome.  The kids love it and I'm excited to try more of the menu
4 The chips and salsa were tasty, loved the salsa! We ordered the nachos and they were even better! The chips were amazing.   I ordered the braised beef and red chili tamales and L.O.V.E.D. them!!! They were so awesome! As were the pinto beans, and I am NOT a pinto bean fan! They had incredible flavor. My husband ordered three different fish tacos, he said the shrimp one was OK, but the other two he loved! He's a picky eater, too! My daughter is the pickiest of eaters, but she loved the chicken out of her taco. I ate the beans and tortilla and thought, even for being super simple, had a ton of delicious flavor.  The service was slow towards the end, miserably slow, but the servers and the hostess were all super friendly and funny. Loved the ambiance, too. We sat outside and it was great! Kiddos loved running on the grass (as no other patrons were out there at the time).   All in all, it was a nice evening with very tasty food! Loved it, thanks Joyride!
5 One word of advice: PINEAPPLE AGUA FRESCA w/TEQUILA  We came in Saturday around 7:15pm.  We loved the decor and friendly laid back vibe.  The restaurant has a really nice patio with comfy booths.  Glad they seated our party of two in a spacious spot!!  The salsa and Chips are really yummy and we got a salad and 3 tacos that were delicious.  The cucumber salad on the side was refreshing to counter the subtle spicy flavors in the tacos.  Of course the fish taco is amazing and the carne asada is pretty classic. Next time we go I want to try the guacamole and grilled corn appetizers.  The main thing I enjoyed was delicious pineapple agua fresca with tequila!!! My sweetie was responsible and barely tried his 1 margarita... I drank most of it because I truly love lime and sour (versus sweet) margaritas. We are just starting in on the refreshing cocktails they offer- I spied over 5 agua frescas that you can customize with alcohol and they offer which agua frescas go best with which liquors.  Too bad we didn't get dessert though I'm confident joyride is an addition to our regular date night spots.  I'm a big fan of any Arizona attempt for quality Mexican inspired food!!
4 The newest member of the Upward Projects family!  They have a pretty good selection to chose from ranging from cute little tacos to big burritos. All of their food is fresh. If you order 3 tacos you get a side free, the tacos range about $3 to $4 so your looking at about $9 to $12 for a taco platter. I ordered two chickens tacos and a fish taco with a side of rice. All were really good. Like their brothers, Winsor & Federal Pizza, if you visit before 6pm for happy hour (everyday) you can get a pitcher of beer (a good selection including local) for $5. The service was really friendly, and the brownie that topped off my meal was delicious. The seating is comfortable with a great outside area complete with fire place for those very small winters.
2 Drinks were ok. I asked for not very sweet but a spicy Cucumber Serrano so my drink was quite sweet w no heat.  I just got tequila  for the second one for 10 bucks. I ordered the veggie burrito to go with no aioli , put it on the side. Nothing came out on the side so I confirmed w my server there was no white magic (lime aioli ugh mayo) but I got home and it was smothered with it. So disappointing. I ate it and now feel ill because it just taste like mayo on a burrito. Exactly what I did not want. Also our bill was padded with an extra drink we didn't have. I won't be back.   Nice atmosphere cool vibe.
3 Really disappointed in the food here. Enjoyed our meal at the Gilbert location when it opened and thought this location would be just as good when it opened, but it was super average.   I will go to the other Postinos owned restaurants in the area before I come back here.
4 Met here for Smunch right about opening time.  Without even getting in to the food the feel of the place was great.  Spring was in the air and the doors were open to the patio with more seating out there.  Our service was great the whole time for a party of around 10.  We had a large enough group several items on the menu got tried.  I had the enchiladas and they let me have one of each.  They were both good.  Normally they serve it with both red and green sauce, next time I would ask for all red as I preferred it.  The salsas and guacamole were great.  The only thing lackluster to me was the beans.  Of those that had tacos it seemed like the fish came in last with shredded beef winning the day.  All of them were good, just in different degrees.  This is just a wonderful spot to gather on a spring day in Phoenix.
5 Joy for Joyride! I'm obsessed with the food, especially the "standard" taco, which is really sort of a misnomer because there is nothing basic about it.  It's flavorful and divine! Nothing here is greasy or overdone-- the food is fresh and light but very, very tasty.  I also love the carnitas taco, and the cheese dip appetizer is to die for.  It's topped with fresh jalapenos, other peppers, and tomatoes/ onions.  Soooooo yummy.    The atmosphere is casual, fun, and very social.  I also love that it's a Mexican joint but they play great indie tunes.  No mariachi! My only complaint about the layout is the seating in the lounge patio where you wait for your table.  There are these little poof seats that put your arse right at the same height as the table and they're uncomfortable.  Yes, this is a very picky little thing but I'm trying to keep myself honest and not just give an all-glowing review.  If you love fresh and light Mexican food, give Joyride a try!
2 Came here for dinner, tried the blood orange cocktail first... Way too syrupy. Tasted fake. Not a fan. Ordered the Ahi tostada for appetizer, and weren't pleased either. The pineapple on it tasted like it was fresh from a can. Dessert-like sweetness. Not very good. We actually decided to head to another place for our entree. Quite disappointed, because we're all big fans of postino and Windsor. Won't be back here anytime soon. On the upside, the service and atmosphere were great.
4 The house margarita was great. Not too sweet. The salsa was nice. Spicy enough. Guacamole was fresh but not exactly Barrio Cafe awesome.  The food was pretty good. I'm sure they'll keep tweeking it.  I had the cochinita pibil taco which was a little bland. The service and the vibe are terrific. Lots of energy and everyone having a great time.
1 Been here twice and had horrible service each time. First time, we waited 45 minutes before a server came to our table to get our drink order. We had to get up and flag someone down. Then of course after that, we had multiple servers coming up asking if we had been helped yet... I think it's because they pool tips and don't have table sections... They all are either redundant or no where to be found.  Second time I went it was one of the strangest experiences I've ever had... Ever.  We were asked THREE times by multiple servers if we had a safe way to get home,but instead of them asking it that way, they gave us long dance-around-the-issue schpeels about the community and how they want to keep it safe. We told em we were light railing home and lived down the street.... they were obviously worried about us drinking and driving. Even after that, thy still failed to being us our last round... Without actually telling us they were cutting us off. We each had three drinks and dinner and had been there for three hours. Then we had to get up and ask for the bill TWICE because no one ever came back to our table after three of them had bomboarded us with questions at separate times.
2 Salsa was very good.   The Enchiladas I had were not very good.  Was not at all impressed with the cochinita pibil tacos, they were not like any I have ever had before.
5 Love this place!!! Love everything on Central!!!! Loved every drink I have tried so far...there spin on the Moscow mule is delish.  I have only tried the tacos so far...crispy fish, shrimp and ahi. Very good!!  This place will be a regular stop for us I'm sure of it!
4 Waited to review until all the freshness had worn off. Great experience - except for parking.. but this whole area is horrific for parking. Awesome, cocktails had the Moscow mule ala Joyride -- yummy... ... really great and unique food.
4 These are the best tacos I've ever had! The only problem I had was with the service. There was only one waiter, though there were two people cleaning. The food came out 10 minutes after we ordered, but when it came, my brother and I agreed that it was worth the wait. We came for a light lunch, so we got two tacos each. They are individually priced, so you need to think about how much you want to eat. I got the carne asada and the standard tacos. They were perfectly made and I was enjoying them so much! I would definitely recommend this place to anyone who wants some high-quality Mexican food.
4 Met a friend there for an early dinner.  It is decorated beautifully.  The light fixtures are fabulous.  My friend was running late but they sat me on the patio anyway.  The server did seem a little irked that my other party was tardy.  She kept coming by a bit too frequently to ask...So I ordered 2 citrus agua frescas that were very refreshing and not too sweet.  Then feeling bad that I hadn't really ordered anything yet, I ordered some guac and chips.  It was perfectly fine guacamole....not the greatest I've had, but there are some unusually good guacamoles in this town.  There was jicama in it, which was interesting.  When friend arrived, we ordered the grilled corn or eliote with cotija cheese and paprika and a sauce called White Magic.  I think it's an amped up mayonnaise.  The corn was excellent.  Had a real grilled, slightly charred taste that I love about it.  I had a trio of tacos, one shrimp, one pibil, one braised beef.   They are the small street tacos which have become so popular.   With a trio of tacos you get a free side.  I asked the server what the beans were spiced with and she said in a kind of spaced out voice, "I don't know....salt?"  That made us laugh.  My friend ordered a carne asada torta and was quite pleased with it and I had the shrimp taco left to take home.  The shrimp were fresh and cooked well, the braised beef taco was awesome and the pibil was just fine.  And those beans?  Meh...I think the sever was right about the spice being salt.  The only real problem with Joyride is one wants to sit on the patio but the chairs are the most uncomfortable things I have EVER sat on in a restaurant.  I kept looking longingly  inside to see the comfy chairs those diners were sitting on.  It was a long dinner and my butt still hurt the next morning.  They are cute yellow metal things though.  But perhaps Joyride should rethink the function following form thing and invest in something a bit less torturous.  I will just know to always sit inside in the future.  They open the whole side of the restaurant so you can get tables close to the edge of the patio and have the al fresco experience.  All in all, a solid meal.  Definitely worth a return visit.
1 Sorry this one is a miss.  Love Postino's and Windsor, but Joyride is not too good.  Food was really disappointing. Tacos were so average and service so so.  Maybe my expectations were too high.  I think I'll stay with America's taco shop.
3 I have now been here twice.  Both times with groups 6-10 in size.  I love the restaurant group for their fantastic decor and mood, but the service is TERRIBLE!  Both times now it has taken 20+ minutes to get a drink.  Our waitress tonight never asked if we wanted appetizers (which we did because they are fantastic).  Drinks were never refilled.  I had to flag her down to order a second drink.  I wish I ever got her name so she could know how horrible she was.    The tacos are very good.  I had a sandwhich tonight and regretted it.  I would go back to tacos next time.  They are overpriced for what you get, but they have great flavor.    The appetizers are all fantastic.  I don't know if I would even order of the real menu anymore.  I want this place to be so much better, but it just isn't.
4 Food was deeeeliisshhhh. The only thing is their menu is pretty strict. They don't have anything else you can add to your meal, you can only take things out. No substitutions. Other than that it was delicious! There is inside and outside seating as well as awesome indoor decor. We shall be back!
2 Good lunch or hang out spot for sure. Hipster approved. Had an order of fish tacos. Not so impressed. Very bland, nothing special. At almost $4 each for a "street taco" I would expect a bit more discovery in the taste bud area. However, the tortilla soup was great. Service on the other hand was mildly annoying. Three different employees came to our table during the meal. I'm not quite sure who was the server, the runner, the busser. The one I'm assuming was the server took our order, stopped by once and ...poof. Never saw the person again. We were left sitting with empty dishes and that we-need-to-get-back-to-work-look on our faces way too long. Everyone was nice, but the restaurant manager needs to tighten up the service process if one expects weekday/workday lunch crowd approval.
4 We went to Joyride with some friends for Happy Hour on a Sunday afternoon.  Upward Projects does it again with this amazing place.  The layout and decor is done perfectly with no expense spared.  It is a fun joyful atmosphere that is lively by not too loud.   Our waiter was very friendly and outgoing as he suggested drinks to our group.  I had the strawberry Aguas Freshcas with rum and my husband had the Mazatlan Mule.  We also shared the Better than Betty's chocolate dessert which was the perfect way to end Happy Hour.  I am sure we will be back for Happy Hour and maybe try out some more of the food next time too.
5 The feel of this new Upward Projects concept is amazing!  Mid Century Modern with a Mexican twist... so unique.  The people working here are very friendly and the despite being a newer place, the service doesn't seem to have kinks to be worked out, which is nice.  The food is very good, with the exception of a couple "just ok" experiences.  The drink specials, and atmosphere keep us coming back for Sunday Fundays and weeknight dinners!
4 I might be harsher than some but to break down my review I'll give Joyride a 4 if not a 5 out of 5 for the atmosphere something I always find important but a 3/5 for the food (after my initial visit). I've known been a total of 3 times at the time of this review and can't say there isn't anything to dislike. I had heard about Joyride more and more from friends mentioning it on their FB walls and Instagram pics and finally made it there on a weekend. The place was quite packed but not so much that we had to wait to be seated. A nice and diversified group of patrons was there (families, 20 and 30 somethings groups of friends). Great mix.I've since come back. In terms of food I can't say anything about "The Standard" their chicken soft taco as well as the "Baja Fish" (I tend to lean on the milder side of things). I've had the Mexican street corn and black beans for appetizers and they were very good. The soft tacos are delicious, the waiters great and the whole mix makes for a place that you'll want to come back to.
3 Food is 5 stars   Atmosphere is 5 stars   Music playlist is 5 stars  Services ruined it all for me. This seems to be a trend with central Phx restaurants. Maybe it is a vibe I don't understand? We are all about relaxing, but I still expect my drinks to be filled in a timely manner. We got things done quicker by asking random servers that passed by, rather than our server doing it.   Will try again and get the stars up hopefully.
5 Let's see . . . what did I like best? My thirst quenching Blood Orange Margarita? . . . or was it the incredible Guacamole and fresh chips? Or was it the two together, sitting on the patio with a warm spring breeze late on a Saturday afternoon?   Hard to believe that I'm in Uptown Phoenix Rising and I could have sworn I was sitting next to the beach in Mexico.  So relaxing. I just wanted to take my shoes off and wiggle my toes in the white sand and sit and enjoy the afternoon and evening . . . have another Margarita . . . or two. This is life at its best.   You know you've hit a good spot when it can conjure up day dreams that wash your cares away with each wave rolling in . . . just from a little Margie & Guac?  Maybe I had too many? Naught!  You're driving, right?
3 I had plans to go with a friend to Joyride last night.  Yesterday afternoon, I read a review of Joyride in the Phoenix New Times, and it was less than enthusiastic.  It basically said that the atmosphere was cool, but the food was all pretty bland.  Unfortunately, I have to say that I agree with the reviewer.   I arrived around 6:45 on a Wednesday, and there was a 30 minute wait.  My friend and I sat at the bar, and the bartender was friendly and attentive.  We were seated at a great table that was kind of half inside and half on the patio.  The weather was perfect last night, so I definitely enjoyed that.  We started off with chips and guac.  I read one Yelp review from yesterday that raved about the chips and guac, and, I honestly have no idea why.  The chips were very bland, as was the guac.  I LOVE good chips and guac, so I was disappointed.  I wasn't crazy about the salsa either, which I also thought was bland.  Although the New Times review specifically had talked about the fish taco being soggy and fishy, I tried it anyway b/c my friend had ordered them at the Gilbert location and said they were the best fish tacos ever.  Well, there must be some disconnect between the two locations, because this fish taco was nothing to write home about.  It wasn't soggy, but it was definitely on the fishy side compared to other fried fish tacos I've had, and the white sauce that they put on it was basically flavorless.  I also had a carne asada taco, which our waitress said was her favorite.  It was pretty good, but nothing special...definitely better than the fish, though.  Finally, I had a side of the street corn.  I am very picky when it comes to Mexican street corn, and this wasn't great.  I don't know what it was, but it almost tasted like mayonnaise.  Usually I love the creamy sauce that comes on street corn in restaurants, but I wasn't feeling it at Joyride.  I would really like to give Joyride 2.5 stars, but I can't, so I'm rounding up for great service, cool atmosphere, and for the fact that none of the food was awful.  I don't think I'll go back, though.  Yes, it's a cool atmosphere, but, if I'm going to have to wait half an hour on a Wednesday, I want great food as well.  Plus, it was so crowded that my friend and I almost had to yell at each other.  I ordered pretty much all the same things at Gallo Blanco last month and was blown away, so I think I'll head there instead next time I'm craving tacos and street corn.
5 Yum! My husband and I came here for a quick, early dinner. I ordered the Ahi Tuna Taco and the Chicken Tinga Taco. My husband ordered the Chicken Burrito, which I had a couple bites of. The flavors of each were so different from the other, but equally scrumptious. Not to mention, you can never go wrong with free chips and deliciously spicy salsa. This place not only has delicious food, but the atmosphere and set up are great! I definitely want to come back at night to enjoy the lights, fireplace and drinks.
4 This was my first visit here and It was a good one.  I started out with the lunch special of two tacos and a soup.  For the tacos I had a crispy fish and a carne asada.  I added the tortilla soup as well.    The carne asada was pretty decent.  I've definitely had better.  It was a little dry and burnt on some pieces but good flavor and just enough spice with the salsa they add.    The crispy fish however was really good.  Great crisp on the breading and the sauces they add give it a great overall taste.  I would for sure get multiples of these again in the future.    Now as for the soup I had it was lacking in a lot of areas.  It came out just slightly over warm temperature which was my first turn off.  I also had next to no chicken in it with mostly broth and a lot of veggies.  Missing something as far seasoning but I couldn't pin point what it was.  I just know I've bad much better at other Mexican restaurants.    All in all a good lunch experience and I will be back to try some other items.
5 Joyride is the best new retaurant downtown, hands down.. My waiters were personable and knowlegeable.  If you like postino, federal pizza, and windsor, you'll love joyride, their most recent success.. the staff is attentive, and the management cares about your experience.. Enjoy a hand crafted, organic cocktail, and a glimpse into the street taco world!
3 Food was pretty good, not fantastic.  Music was so loud that a normal conversational tone was not sufficient. Not sure if I'd recommend it, not bad...not great. Go next door and get a pizza.
5 Awesome environment. Stellar food. Amazing playlist.   I enjoyed the Baja taco and grilled fish taco... Very tasty and great service.
3 Not a bad place, just not up to par with their other offerings like Windsor and Federal Pizza. I've been twice now, and tried several of their tacos. I think the Cochinita Pibil was my favorite so far, and the sweetness of the pineapple made it stand out. None of the tacos were bad, but no other ones particularly stood out.  On my first trip I had the Cucumber Serrano cocktail, which I quite liked. On the second trip I went with the house margaritas, which were pretty nice by house marg standards.  The decor was nice, and the service was good both times, so no real complaints there. But if you're in that area looking for a tasty, relaxing bite and a drink I think you'll do better at Postinos overall.
3 Good service, good beer, good decor. Not good tacos! 3 of my friends agree with this rating!
3 Dated unadventurous menu. Service was good.  Food wasn't bad but wasn't memorable and we will probably not go back anytime soon.  We were hoping to find a cool spot in central Phoenix and it was just O.K. Would love to see them take a few risks with the food with not only this restaurant but their others as well.
2 While I am not willing to spend $3+ on an inauthentic street taco, I am more than happy to have someone else take me here and pay for me to eat a delicious (if inauthentic) street taco. (Let's remember, once again, I am a broke college student.)  The incredibly hip modern-American atmosphere with just a bit of kitschy beachiness to it is a wonderful nod to the decor finesse of all Upward Projects' styles.  I ordered the tortilla soup and split a quesadilla with the rest of the table as well. The quesadilla was tasty, and so was the soup (the soup was really spicy.)  I tasted my friend's rice. It was very rice-like, but lacked flavor.  Our waiter was also really slow at filling our water glasses.  I probably won't suggest going here, and will most likely contest going here if I have to pay for myself, but if someone else is paying, I'll give it another chance.  Take my review with a grain of salt: I really really like authentic taco places where you have to speak Spanish and drive south of the tracks. If you like Americanized street tacos, you'll probably like this place. Go ahead. Give it a shot.  Pro tip: Definitely give the salsa a chance. It's delicious.
5 Please do not listen to all this negativity.... This place just rocks.... Every time we go there we can't wait for the next time to go back. Bartenders are fabulous. Manager Rocks! They care what how you feel about their establishment. Nachos are to live for. Tacos are to savor... Margaritas are amazing... Ambiance is like no other.... The Ahi Taco was perfect. Yes the UPWARD PROJECTS did not mess up on this one... They just took it up a notch!!!! BAM!!!!!!!
5 Love this place, great decor, food - while not traditional Mexican, is very tasty and reasonably priced as are the drinks.  We stopped in the first time just for drinks and they kindly gave us chips and salsa and kept giving us more and the service was very attentive. Close to the light rail grid for easy transport. I feel like I am on vacation even though I live here so they have succeeded in my mind!
5 Great set up, bright and happy colors. Energetic waiters and waitresses. This company knows what they are doing when they open restaurants. The tacos are amazing and their twist on mixed drinks is quite interesting and unique. Highly recommended.
4 Great family friendly place!! The atmosphere  was really nice, whether you sat inside or outside. The food was great and the cocktails were delicious!
2 While the dessert was fabulous, the service was not what I would've expected from such a nice restaurant... One of our waiters brought us the wrong drinks, the other one came back only once out of the 2 hours we were there, and a third waiter filled my glass with water and pored it all over our table and kept going. Three stars for the food and zero stars for the rude service...
1 Cinco de Mayo. Epic Fail! First time here.  Been waiting 1.5 hours for our order of carnitas tacos. Really?  Too bad. I've heard good reviews"........
4 I was pleasantly surprised with how good the food is here. I had heard mixed reviews, so I was sketchy on trying it out. I went with a large group of friends and started out with a variety of different appetizers. The guacamole and queso dip with chorizo were bomb!! Yeah the tacos are pricey, 3-5 dollars but honestly that's any price for a taco in the central-downtown phoenix area. I ordered the standard taco and also the crispy fish taco. Both were good. (crispy fish was my favorite) My boyfriend ordered the chicken torta and that was tasty and flavored very well. The pineapple aguas frescas with tequila was definitely a good choice too. Staff was friendly and attentive. Overall, I had a great experience and I will be back!!
2 Staff/Managers could use a huge imporvement. Food is excellent but customer service is seriously lacking. My office placed a rather large order (15 people) the day before we needed it, and we were told to call back with payment, even though we were prepared to pay right then. We then called back 3 more times, and were told that the manager was not available, to try back again later. We called the next morning to try and pay for our order AGAIN, and surprise surprise, it was never even written down. It's now about an hour before we need the order to be ready. We order out often, and our business is usually much appreciated, but they made it seem like a huge hassle. We will never order from here again.
3 Not too bad. I was gifted a night out from a friend who raved about the food here. We brought extra money since we planned on having a few drinks (we can walk there), but didn't need it. $40 fed us both, with appetizers, dinner, drinks, and dessert. The only complaint I have is that I was really looking forward to a "Pickled Cucumber Salad," since pickles are just pickled cucumbers, I was excited to see what this creation was. It's just cucumbers with some vinegar drizzled across the top- not very creative. Also, after we cashed out, our waitress never came back. I think they have a weird wait staff situation going on, because they all seem pretty flighty, running around all nilly-willy and bothering other tables. Maybe it was just busy, but I prefer to have less people interrupting my first night out since having a baby... just sayin'. I expected the pretentious hipster vibe, but I think they did a nice job with this place, it's more eclectic than that. There's a very peaceful feeling under the trees and in the open air that get's lost when the chatter of nearby tables becomes yelling to hear over the music. So, if you're like me, go on an off night and sit on the patio, look into the trees, and have a relaxing frothy beverage. It's an A-OK place to be, and sometimes that's exactly what you need.
2 Decided to try this place out with my boyfriend on Cinco de mayo since they were offering $2 carnitas tacos all day. Like all upward project restaurants, it has very cool, hip vibe with a decent size patio...definitely looked like a cool hangout spot to grab drinks with friends. Unfortunately I will not be returning as the food was nothing impressive & service was terrible. The only thing we did like was the complimentary chips & salsa. The tortilla chips were thin & crispy & the salsa was a nice, fresh roasted tomato salsa. So we tried the carnitas tacos...it was decent but nothing I would come back for. I've had way better street tacos elsewhere like Los Taquitos.  So If you're looking for authentic tacos, this is not the place.  As for the terrible service, maybe they were short staffed or that it was cinco de mayo but we came around 9:30-10:00pm (late dinner) and the restaurant was not that packed but a simple "sorry we're short staffed but we'll do our best to attend to your needs" would have sufficed & we could have forgiven them for their slow service, not refilling our water or the fact they constantly walked pass our table without acknowledging us.  Will not be coming back & definitely will not recommend this place to our friends.
3 The food is pretty darn good.  Beers on tap are great!  But the service is terrible.  I have been here at least  5 times.  Who is my waiter, where is my waiter,  I never really know.  Like other reviewers have said, you have better luck snagging someone that is passing by.  Management should be able to fix this problem in one day!!  I especially like the part about having valets there when it's two in the afternoon and the parking lot is empty.  What is going on there??
2 I go to Happy Hour with my coworkers here and it's okay.    I'm GLUTEN-FREE due to a diagnosed wheat allergy, and there are VERY few things I can eat here.  The service  (and perhaps the kitchen staff) is iffy and does not understand issues of cross-contamination with food allergens.  My server there the first time went to ask the chef what I could eat (and I said "severe wheat allergy" several times) and came back telling me I could eat the chips among a few other things.  I ate ONE chip and my mouth started itching.  I called him back over and asked if they used a shared fryer for wheat/gluten-bearing and wheat/gluten-free products and he came back saying that they did fry the chips in the same oil as the wheat-filled churros  That's allergen cross-contamination 101 and anyone in food service in this day and age should think/know about it and communicate that to customers.  Had I not known by hard experience to take a tiny bite and go slow no matter what my server said, I would have had to Epi-Pen myself.  Infuriating and totally unnecessary.    And, if Joyride would simply use a dedicated fryer for its chips, I'd be able to eat a lot more -- including the yummy-looking chips and salsa and their amazing-looking nachos.   As is, there are two or three tacos I can supposedly eat.  I stick with the Standard taco because it's never made me sick.  The food taste and quality is uneven - one time I had a fantastic one, full of fresh, sweet corn kernels.  Other times the taco has been okay, with hardly any corn.  Proportions of ingredients change, affecting the taste -- perhaps because of the availability of fresh ingredients?  All in all, I go because I like hanging out with my friends from work.  But I wouldn't choose to go back on my own with my husband or family.  It really annoys me when good restaurants who COULD make their menus more food-allergy friendly don't and when poorly-trained staff make recommendations that could really hurt people.
5 Nachos are awesome! Fish tacos amazing. Margaritas are yummy
3 Good restaurant concept. Great vibe. Would have given 4 stars but valet parking only. Fresh ingredients. Went here for Easter lunch and had no problems getting in and there was plenty of parking that I couldn't park my own car into.  You can get plenty of food for under $10 but most likely will go over 10 per person especially if you're getting alcohol.  House margarita was tasty. No need to go top-shelf, but that have that too. Overall a bit on the pricey side for Mexican, but you're paying for location and the swank ambiance. The free salsa is good. I tried the un-free habanero salsa (they let me try it for free thankfully) and didn't like it.  So before you buy the un-free salsas ask for a taste.
5 Staff is always friendly and welcoming. Food is great and the drinks are consistently flowing! Everyone needs to come here.
5 Jason was our server we came on a Monday evening with our good friend and my boyfriend. absolutely excellent food every single time. Also excellent service every single time Jason is the section to sit in! one of the most chill servers to have and knows a lot about his beers as well. Come see Jason at joyride! Amazing food!
2 I stumbled upon Joyride during their soft open and was graciously invited in for dinner and drinks. Ate almost everything and drank a lot and it was free. Amazing ambience and great people and music and servers. The food was amazing, we were blown out the water. Especially the Veggie Taco's, Im a meat guy, but the Veggie Taco was out of this world. Oh man we loved it. My BF and I decided we were definitely going back.  We went back a second time. The ambience was still amazing and lively and we sat down,and ordered drinks and food and were so excited bc we talked it up. And the waitress was so awesome. The food came, and there was something off. The food went from a 10/10 to an 8/10.  3rd time i went with some new friends who were excited to go bc of how much we talked it up. The ambience and people were lively, great staff and ordered the food and drinks and the food came and it was like "what the heck is happening", it was a 7/10. Friends looked at me like "Youre at culinary school and you eat at a lot of places around the world and this is what you like?"  4th time Again the ambience and staff is great and lively, but the food wasnt great. I didnt enjoy it at all. No one did. it was a 6/10  Finally the 5th time, same, great ambience but the trio salsa was gross, and the food, i wanted to just scarf it down to leave. I wanted to ask for the Chef, but the food has been consistently gross. We decided to stop going.
4 Lee is an awesome bartender
3 I am giving this place a three because it is beautiful inside. However, I did not have the best experience as far as service goes. It took 20 minutes to get water. Plus, valet only.. really? The food was ok. The main thing that I didn't like is you couldn't tell which hipster was your server . Confusing because they dont have any kind of uniform.  They did give us a $10.00 coupon because we had bad service. So... eh.
5 We have been to joyride about 5 or 6 times since becoming vegetarian. Food is wonderful and the service is typically good.   They have a wonderful vegi taco and there salsa is very tasty. Top all of that off with the pinto beans and it's a wonderful meal. I took my mom for Mother's Day and the parents were very impressed. This is a must visit place.
4 Joyride is a little bit of a mixed bag. When we arrived for happy hour the place was hopping. We were seated outside (without them asking if that was alright first, but it was alright...). When asked if it was still happy hour, the hostess replied 'is it before 5?' a little snarky.... but ok. The service overall was slow and somewhat inattentive, but they were busy so they have an excuse at least. The food and drinks, on the other hand, were very tasty. We ordered drinks, I asked what was better between the horchata with alcohol or the blood orange margarita.....well, they were out of the horchata, so marg it was. The marg was large, tasty, and at only 5$ on happy hour, I was a happy camper. The husband had the pineapple aguas frescas... this was less delicious. It just tasted like pineapple juice and alcohol... not bad, but not wonderful.  The salsa was just subtly spicy and full of flavor. The husband and I shared 3 tacos - fried fish, chicken tinga, and the pork. I would say the best was the fish, very light and crispy, followed by the pork, and then the chicken (which was fine, but was supposed to be spicy and wasn't really). Because we ordered 3 tacos, we got a side. Our server wasn't sure if they were out of rice (early in the afternoon?), but they did have it. It was fine, pretty standard rice, but the green salsa that was served on top was very tasty. The food was very filling and it was affordable, so I will most likely visit again!
4 Good food and atmosphere. Crispy fish taco is great, ahi fish taco was very flavor able service was fast with lots of thoughtful follow-up.  It's a nice spot, give it a try!
5 Last week we thought we would give Joyride Taco another try,  after all we really liked the food and drinks.  WOW what a difference!!  The food is still great, and the service has had a major upgrade.  We noticed the waiters concentrated on the guests, and other staff had been added to do cleanup, etc.
5 Went to Joyride for the first time with a couple of friends last Friday for happy hour and had a wonderful time. It is a unique and hidden gem nestled between Postino's and Federal Pizza. The food and service was amazing and I enjoyed all of the food and drink recommendations made by the servers. I definitely recommend the pineapple agua Fresca with vodka added, the chicken burrito, and the bottomless chips and salsa (the chips are a little salty, but can be easily washed down with a agua Fresca or another one of their tasty beverages!)   All of the servers made us feel welcome, wanted, and appreciated. I plan on returning again soon for another happy hour with friends!
4 Paleo language is a difficult one to translate to Mexican food. While much of the cuisine is beans, rice and cheese much of it is also fresh and full of flavor. Joyride offers an impressive taco menu. I was nervous to ask if I could order sans the taco shells- oh and sans cheese- oh and gluten free. Our bartender immediately reassured me it was NO PROBLEMO at all to accommodate my needs! I had three kinds of tacos the way I wanted along with a side of fresh guacamole and cucumber+orange salad. All freshly made and full of fresh herbs and veggies. Gracias Kate and Joyride!!
4 Whos got two thumbs and really likes this place.. This guy!  I didnt give it a 5 star because it really takes alot to.... wait. I dont have to justify my Yelps to you or anybody! ;0)  Went with the kiddies. Yummy Guacamole.... (could be a slightly bigger dish.)  Its great place. We had fast service. Pricing is reasonable. Atmosphere was cool. Im a big fan of places that dont have uniforms on the staff. This is one such place.
5 Wow, this place was seriously amazing!   My friend and I went after work for Happy Hour and because we remembered their tacos at the Devoured festival. Our server Taryn was also super sweet and friendly, and answered all of our questions. I ended up getting the crispy fish taco, which turned out to be the best taco I've ever eaten! Also, because we got there before 4pm, we got to take part in their lunch special, (2 tacos and a small bowl of soup or salad for $10)!  I also got a $5 Mexican 75 cocktail and it was so good, I didn't even realize I'd had the whole thing in less than 5 minutes!   Definitely added to my list of favorite places, and I can't wait to go back!
4 Good meal. Multiple servers. Comped without asking for a large portion of bill due to service delays. Friendly and yummy.
3 To be fair, we came here because we had been told no more wine at Postino's across the way so perhaps we were a little grouchy already.  The atmosphere is cheery and bright.  The servers are pretty and helpful.  The food is good just not what I'd crave of think of when I think of Mexican food in Az.  Example:  queso ordered and no spice whatsoever.  This is the perfect place to take your hipster friends from the Midwest who would be a little to squeamish at the idea of going to South Phoenix for the original Los Dos Molinos, or simply and won't handle spicy food.  On the positive side, a good place to take friends who are vegetarian, a lot more offerings than your typical restaurant.
5 Ahi tacos are incredible. All the fish is fresh never frozen. The staff is super friendly and the music doesn't suck (usually). Today I made a minor (solicited) complaint about a taco and the staff went WAY out of their way to make me happy. The chef himself brought me a  new taco, they knocked it off my bill anyway and even gave me a free drink. I always sit at the bar, so I can't comment on the wait staff but the place looks like they only hire attractive tattooed people. No complaints here. Drinks appear to be strong too... Still typing.
4 Thanks you Upward Projects...you make it so hard to go back to work after hanging out at your cool and hip Mexican joint. I feel like I'm on a Mexican vacation when I visit here and all I need is a sombrero and a cabana boy. I love getting away from work and coming back here for lunch. Great decor and amazing patio to enjoy when the weather is perfect. Now let's talk about the tacos... Lots of a great variety to choose from. My favorite are the crispy fish and the braised beef street tacos. Can't go wrong with anything you order here. The salsa also has a great kick to it. Make it your next lunch stop or hot spot... It will leave you and you belly happy and satisfied.
4 Really nice place, great outdoor space and excellent service. Their ahi tuna tacos are above and beyond. Be sure to try their orchata, really good. My critique will be to be more consistent with the side dishes method of preparation. They never tasted/looked the same.
3 It was okay. I had high hopes since the other restaurants there from the same owner are well established.   I also prefer authentic mexican food, this is more new gourmet mexican, wasn't bad just not my preference. I did only get a burrito which was mighty fine in its own right.  Would i come back? Yes. Do i crave it? No
5 One of my new favorite spots here in Central Phoenix.   The Space: So happy that Upward Projects has added the necessary parking lot among their complex of restaurants along central avenue. Granted there's the Valet available for Joyride but I'm sure none of the valets are enjoying parking an old 96' Geo Prizm :P There is street parking available as well for those of you not wanting to valet if the parking lot is full across the street. The overall space is fun, energetic, and retro. Beautiful geometric tile work along the walls, fun lighting fixtures above the bar and on the walls, a beautiful patio with fireplace, and a glass wall open during the winter months to create a true indoor/outdoor dining experience. Much of the inside of the restaurant is taken up by a large wrap around bar with several booths and tables set up around the perimeter.   Service: During most of my experiences I have had excellent service! Staff usually contributes to the laid-back, fun atmosphere by getting comfortable with guests at the table and engaging in conversation - not just taking our order. Every once and a while (primarily when the restaurant is slammed) service tends to lack a little - for understandable reasons.   Food and Drinks:  Most speciality cocktails are regularly priced at $9. The cocktails are generous pours and mostly tequila based. Fun cocktails including a cucumber-serano drink. Food has always been excellent! From the variety of delicious tacos to choose from to the large burritos the food has always been on point. My personal favorite is the Nachos with Chicken Tinga - certainly more food than one person needs but I can never stop myself!!   Head on over to Joyride for a fun, casual dinning experience with everything to offer: atmosphere, service, food, and drinks!
5 I've been back three or four times since my first review of Joyride. I'd like to say it is just as good each time . . . but you know, I think it gets better and better! Oh, the blood orange margarita and guacamole lived up to their usual reputations, but I swear every entree I try is better than the last one I had. Today it was crispie fish tacos (2) & a vegetable taco, with a side of orange cucumber salad. OMGoodness it was so good. Service was even better than usual (and it is always good!)! Christian, supurb bartender, waited on us.  Thanks, Christian, for making our Sunday lunch so enjoyable!
3 I really wanted to LOVE Joyride after hearing all the hype. Did I LOVE it? No. Did I like it? Yes...   The decor and atmosphere is fun and trendy. The chairs and booths were all comfy. HUGE bar area which I thought was great.   Service was really good. We had two different ladies waiting on us. They were both friendly and attentive.   Drinks and food were okay. I got the blood orange margarita. At first sip I was like "Wow this is great!" After a few more, it started to get SO sweet. I could barely finish it. I ordered the crispy fish, shrimp and ahi tacos. The crispy fish was actually really good but the other two were rather bland. The ahi was dry. I got black beans as a side and they were also very bland (I added some salt myself.).   They give you complimentary chips and salsa in the beginning but it's a fire roasted salsa. If you want any other kind besides fire roasted you have to pay.   Also, I wish they had a couple tvs at the bar area. We wanted to meet up with some friends to watch the USA soccer game and would have stayed here, but ended up going to a different restaurant to watch it since Joyride didn't have any tvs.  I will probably return to give this place another chance and maybe try some different things. I was torn between 3 and 4 stars but the food just didn't knock my socks off.
3 Not bad for american-mexican food. Honestly it was a toss up between 3 & 4 stars.  I went with 3.  The veggie burrito was good with meat added but the tacos needed a little extra something......especially the fish taco.  I also didn't really care for the salsa, not bad but i expected more.
4 I am becoming a big fan of Upward Projects. I love Windsor, Federal Pizza, Churn, and Postino. Now I can add Joyride to the list.  Parking is much easier with the addition of the lot next to Windsor. You can also park along the street right next to Joyride if it isn't peak meal time. There's several doors around the perimeter of the building; someone will gladly point you to the host/hostess.  You can sit at a table, at the bar, or at a community table. Restaurant is large, has nice geometric patterns on the walls, and there's interesting light fixtures by the bar.  Chips and salsa: thin crispy warm chips yum, and delish spicy salsa  Cheese y mas: lots of nice fresh toppings on a bed of warm queso; simple flavor and really good  Veggie and goat cheese enchiladas: a little limited on the veggies in the enchiladas, and a lot of goat cheese so if you aren't a fan, get chicken. Also, no sides. That being said, the verde sauce is tangy and delish, and everything is well seasoned for a delightful harmony of flavors in your mouth.  The beast: made it enchiladas style with verde sauce. Delicious, tender beef and a nice mix of beans and avocado inside.  Good drink specials, as with all the Upward Projects restaurants. I can't wait to try the agua frescas and margaritas.
5 One of the best customer service experiences in a restaurant ever! Thank goodness for good servers & bartenders to guide me through my traditionally awkward journey to a new eatery. Upon existing my car I do remember saying "ah, shit they're playing techno, do you want to go somewhere else?" Also weary because the dirty word "hipster" was used to describe the place. But ALAS! The drinks were fantastic and I'm overly pleased with the beer selection. I personally got a cucumber mint tequila "juice" and loved it! I'm looking forward to trying out the different combinations of flavors and liquors (hey there's a logical excuse to drink more!). Food was fantastic as well. I ordered the standard the Baja fish tacos. They are served up in taco stands and I could have managed to polish off one more. The flavor combinations are classic enough to please a skeptic and creative enough to satisfy the more adventurous such as myself. The date got a chimi-style carne Asada burrito and claimed it to be the best he's had in Phoenix this far. And that says a lot, trust me. His burrito and my tacos had fresh sliced avocado to top off our foodie perfection. Even the restrooms were an aesthetically pleasing experience. Prices were reasonable, and like I said, our server and other employees eased our social anxieties and earned their 25-30% tip to boot. I will quote, "If this is a hipster place then I guess I will join them."
4 Another great addition to Central Phoenix!  I absolutely love the atmosphere and decor of this place...wouldn't furnish my house this way, but totally appreciate and love it!    The staff was super friendly and helpful with suggestions.  The food was great - we tried 6 different kinds of tacos and ordered a few sides too.  The agua fresca was amazing...combo of pineapple and strawberry - yummy!
1 Got the "beast" burrito and it was full of gristle in the meat and had a BONE in it. NEVER will go back..like eating at a Filibertos for 5 times the price. Eat at your own risk.
2 For my first time, I decided to go full out. I ordered a pineapple agua fresca, a carne asada quesadilla, and three carne asada tacos with joy rice. Chips and salsa were complimentary.   My pineapple juice was great! Just the right amount of sweetness!   Chips and salsa were okay. It needed more spice and flavor. The salsa tasted sweet to me.   My carne asada quesadilla was BOMB! Probably the best food item I ordered.   I got my meal about 35 minutes later. The waitress took forever with everything and I didn't like the tacos. The meat had a teriyaki flavor to them topped with some more sweet salsa. I disliked them very much. The rice was better than the tacos, but still tasted off.   The decoration was nice. The atmosphere was clean. The best way I could describe this place was "Mexican food with a hippie twist." If that's what they were going for, they nailed it. This place would not be my first choice or on my list to go to again.
5 Favorite restaurant. Gilbert location was amazing as well, almost better experience than the central location but just about tied. Amazing drinks and food. Glad to see Mexican food modern and yet still a little traditionally represented. Experience is great at the bar or a table, from the first time they set the chips and salsa down!
2 Finally made it to this place.  Every time I've noticed the place, it has a good sized crowd on the patios and it looks like a good time. Kind of fell short.  The Mexican food is like a tex-mex fare which really isn't what I look for in Mexican food.  In fairness, that's my preference and there's probably quite a few people who look for this speciality of the Mexican food class so just expect that kind of menu. The ceviche was pretty good though.
5 Came here for dinner with my wife on our way to a 4th of July party. The entrance is kind of hard to find from the parking lot. But then again, I'm not the sharpest knife in the drawer. This place is much bigger than the one in Gilbert and from the looks of it much hipper too. The place has somewhat of a 70's discotheque feel to it but without the stale cigarette/alcohol smell. My wife had a strawberry agua fresca which was awesome. They bring chips and a roasted salsa to the table which is awesome. I ordered the chicken fila salad which was amazing. It's kale with jicama and crunchy green beans. Sounds weird but just do it and you won't be disappointed. My wife had the chicken tinga that was very good as well. Make sure you ask them for the green salsa. It really makes your plate. They have a patio outside that looks like it'd be awesome to sit in when the weather is nice. At the end of the day, the service was great which always goes a long way for me.
5 The ultimate experience.. From the minute we walked in.. Greeted by Vanessa who had a friendly upbeat attitude.. Seated and served promptly with ice water, chips & salsa! Exactly what you want when it's 109 degrees outside on a Saturday. She told us about their $5 drink happy hour- we were IN! Serrano Cucumber Margarita, blood orange margarita, pineapple mojito, & high roller marg! All the drinks were outstanding!!! We had a cup of the tortilla soup and added a spoon full of salsa.. So delish! We each had the 3 tacos with a side.. All of our tacos were fabulous! My husband is mexican and he was even impressed!! So you know it's good!! The service was top notch!!! On point, period!  All in all --- a Hip Mexican joint with Great food!!!  Cannot wait to go back!!
5 I have to give 5 stars just for the tacos. They have the best tacos I have ever had (I have tried a lot). Every single one is good but my favorites are the chicken, braised beef and ahi tuna. Misters outside are a plus. They have valet and located in between 2 other good restaurants, postino and a pizza place (can't remember the name).
5 One word: NACHOS  This place by far has been a favorite since relocating to Phoenix... I've always been impressed by the quality of this chains food (Postinos, Windsor, Federal Pizza & Churn) but this place was an absolute treat! When they brought out the salsa, I was highly impressed by the speedy service.. I ordered the nachos with carne asada and whew! I was blown away.. The abundance of avocado (I'm an avocado whore) and the tender/flavorful carne asada was out of this world. If you like spicy I highly recommend the habanero salsa (for an additional 1.99).. Yum! In honor of this review, I'm going to get some nachos now;)
4 Their salsa has a nice kick .We ordered their wacamole was a nice portion and the chips were plentiful. Their servers are very friendly and always attentive.  We had their lunch  special which is salad plus choice of two tacos we had the shrimp which was very flavorful
